Tennessee, session 114, HB1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of
revenue, is urged to study the potential impact on transportation infrastructure needs of
requiring personal trailers used for the transportation of boats to be registered in this state. If
such study is conducted, on or before January 1, 2027, the department of transportation shall
report findings and recommendations to the chairs of the transportation and safety committee of
the senate and the committee in the house of representatives having jurisdiction over
transportation.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1754
010967
- 1 -